Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 2.2 Capitol Police for Public Buildings

12-2.2-1.
Appointment of capitol police.

The director of public safety may appoint qualified persons to act as “capitol police officers,” who shall be members of the state classified service. Upon appointment of an officer, the director shall issue to the person a license to act as a capitol police officer and the license shall, in the courts of this state, be evidence of the validity of the appointment of the person named and of his or her authority to act as a capitol police officer at any of the buildings or grounds within the jurisdiction of the division of public buildings as assigned by the chief of public buildings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 4.

12-2.2-2.
Powers of capitol police officers.

Upon issuance of a license under §

12-2.2-1

, the person so designated as a capitol police officer shall have the same immunities and may exercise, in and upon the lands and buildings owned or leased by the state of Rhode Island and assigned to the Rhode Island public buildings authority, or to any municipal or private facility in which a state agency or a state court is convening a public meeting or public hearing, and upon streets and highways immediately adjacent to those lands, the same powers and authority of a police officer, as are conferred by the laws of this state upon members of the division of state police, including the power to arrest persons for violation of state criminal statutes or for violation of city or town ordinances of the city or town in which the state property is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 57, § 1.

12-2.2-3.
Badges.

Any capitol police officer appointed under this chapter shall, when on duty and in uniform, wear in plain sight a metallic badge, inscribed with the words “capitol police of the state of Rhode Island.” When not in uniform, the officer must carry his or her badge on his or her person while on duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 252, § 1.

12-2.2-4.
Continuing powers of state and local police.

Appointment of capitol police officers pursuant to this chapter shall in no way limit the powers, authority, and responsibility of state police and police of the various cities and towns to enforce state law and municipal ordinances on property owned or leased by the state of Rhode Island. The division of state police and city and town police shall assist capitol police officers in matters relating to the detention and arraignment of prisoners for court. Capitol police officers shall submit reports concerning an arrest to the department of public safety and the division processing the arrest, whether the division of state police or the police in the city or town the state owned property is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 4.

12-2.2-5.
Classes in law enforcement.

All capitol police shall be required to attend and successfully complete any law enforcement courses that the director of public safety shall require. These law enforcement courses will be conducted by either the state police or the municipal police training school for the benefit of the capitol police.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 4.

12-2.2-6.
Temporary assignment of capitol police officers.

Upon the convening of the general assembly in each year, four (4) members of the capitol police will be assigned to these branches of government for security purposes. Two (2) capitol police officers will be chosen by the speaker of the house of representatives and two (2) capitol police officers will be chosen by the president of the senate to serve in these capacities. Duties assigned, clothing to be worn, and hours to be worked will be designated by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate. These four (4) capitol police officers will be considered “on assignment” whenever officially assigned to any place used by the general assembly to conduct its business, or any place used by the committee or members of the general assembly to conduct business.

Following the adjournment of the general assembly, or at any other time designated by the speaker of the house of representatives or the president of the senate, these four (4) capitol police officers will return to their previously assigned duties as members of the capitol police.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 11.

12-2.2-7.
Powers of capitol police officers assigned to the general assembly.

Capitol police officers who are assigned to the general assembly and its members for security purposes shall have the same immunities and may exercise, in any place used by the general assembly to conduct its business, or any place used by any committee or members of the general assembly to conduct business, the same powers and authority of a police officer as are conferred by the laws of this state upon the members of the department of the state police, including the power to arrest persons for violation of ordinances of the city or town.

In conforming with the provisions of §

11-47-9

regarding the possession of firearms, the officers assigned to the general assembly will be considered “on assignment” when on designated duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 315, § 1.